Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1389.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 45-412, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-412. Subsequent active management areas; criteria; review of groundwater basins not subject to active management A. The director may shall designate an area which that is not included within an initial active management area, pursuant to section 45-411, as a subsequent active management area if the director determines that any of the following exists: 1. Active management practices are necessary to preserve the existing supply of groundwater for future needs. 2. Land subsidence or fissuring is endangering property or potential groundwater storage capacity. 3. Use of groundwater is resulting in actual or threatened water quality degradation. B. An active management area designated pursuant to this section may include more than one groundwater basin but shall not be smaller than a groundwater basin or include only a portion of a groundwater basin, except for the regional aquifer systems of northern Arizona. C. The director shall periodically review all areas which that are not included within an active management area to determine whether such areas meet any of the criteria for active management areas as prescribed in this section. END_STATUTE